Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-117
Telecommunications, defined.

Telecommunications means the transmission, between or among points specified by the subscriber, of information of the subscriber's choosing, without a change in the form or content of the information as sent or received.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 18.